Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 7. MENTAL HEALTH AND INTELLECTUAL DISABILITY

SUBTITLE A. SERVICES FOR PERSONS WITH MENTAL ILLNESS OR AN INTELLECTUAL DISABILITY

CHAPTER 533. POWERS AND DUTIES OF DEPARTMENT OF STATE HEALTH SERVICES

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 533.0001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of state health services.

(2) "Department" means the Department of State Health Services.

(3) "Department facility" means a facility listed in Section 532.001(b).

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1460, Sec. 2.22, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 533.0002. COMMISSIONER'S POWERS AND DUTIES; EFFECT OF CONFLICT WITH OTHER LAW. To the extent a power or duty given to the commissioner by this title or another law conflicts with any of the following provisions of the Government Code, the Government Code provision controls:

(1) Subchapter A, Chapter 524;

(2) Section 524.0101;

(3) Sections 524.0151(a)(2) and (b);

(4) Section 524.0202; and

(5) Section 525.0254.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 2.53, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective until April 01, 2025

Sec. 533.0002. COMMISSIONER'S POWERS AND DUTIES; EFFECT OF CONFLICT WITH OTHER LAW. To the extent a power or duty given to the commissioner by this title or another law conflicts with Section 531.0055, Government Code, Section 531.0055 controls.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 2.53, eff. April 1, 2025.

Sec. 533.001. GIFTS AND GRANTS. (a) The department may negotiate with a federal agency to obtain grants to assist in expanding and improving mental health services in this state.

(b) The department may accept gifts and grants of money, personal property, and real property to expand and improve the mental health services available to the people of this state.

(c) The department may accept gifts and grants of money, personal property, and real property on behalf of a department facility to expand and improve the mental health services available at the facility.

(d) The department shall use a gift or grant made for a specific purpose in accordance with the purpose expressly prescribed by the donor. The department may decline the gift or grant if the department determines that it cannot be economically used for that purpose.

(e) The department shall keep a record of each gift or grant in the department's central office in the city of Austin.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533.003. USE OF FUNDS FOR VOLUNTEER PROGRAMS IN LOCAL AUTHORITIES AND COMMUNITY CENTERS. (a) To develop or expand a volunteer mental health program in a local mental health authority or a community center, the department may allocate available funds appropriated for providing volunteer mental health services.

(b) The department shall develop formal policies that encourage the growth and development of volunteer mental health services in local mental health authorities and community centers.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1209, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533.004. LIENS. (a) The department and each community center has a lien to secure reimbursement for the cost of providing support, maintenance, and treatment to a patient with mental illness in an amount equal to the amount of reimbursement sought.

(b) The amount of the reimbursement sought may not exceed:

(1) the amount the department is authorized to charge under Section 552.017 if the patient received the services in a department facility; or

(2) the amount the community center is authorized to charge under Section 534.017 if the patient received the services in a community center.

(c) The lien attaches to:

(1) all nonexempt real and personal property owned or later acquired by the patient or by a person legally responsible for the patient's support;

(2) a judgment of a court in this state or a decision of a public agency in a proceeding brought by or on behalf of the patient to recover damages for an injury for which the patient was admitted to a department facility or community center; and

(3) the proceeds of a settlement of a cause of action or a claim by the patient for an injury for which the patient was admitted to a department facility or community center.

(d) To secure the lien, the department or community center must file written notice of the lien with the county clerk of the county in which:

(1) the patient, or the person legally responsible for the patient's support, owns property; or

(2) the patient received or is receiving services.

(e) The notice must contain:

(1) the name and address of the patient;

(2) the name and address of the person legally responsible for the patient's support, if applicable;

(3) the period during which the department facility or community center provided services or a statement that services are currently being provided; and

(4) the name and location of the department facility or community center.

(f) Not later than the 31st day before the date on which the department files the notice of the lien with the county clerk, the department shall notify by certified mail the patient and the person legally responsible for the patient's support. The notice must contain a copy of the charges, the statutory procedures relating to filing a lien, and the procedures to contest the charges. The executive commissioner by rule shall prescribe the procedures to contest the charges.

(g) The county clerk shall record on the written notice the name of the patient, the name and address of the department facility or community center, and, if requested by the person filing the lien, the name of the person legally responsible for the patient's support. The clerk shall index the notice record in the name of the patient and, if requested by the person filing the lien, in the name of the person legally responsible for the patient's support.

(h) The notice record must include an attachment that contains an account of the charges made by the department facility or community center and the amount due to the facility or center. The superintendent or director of the facility or center must swear to the validity of the account. The account is presumed to be correct, and in a suit to cancel the debt and discharge the lien or to foreclose on the lien, the account is sufficient evidence to authorize a court to render a judgment for the facility or center.

(i) To discharge the lien, the superintendent or director of the department facility or community center or a claims representative of the facility or center must execute and file with the county clerk of the county in which the lien notice is filed a certificate stating that the debt covered by the lien has been paid, settled, or released and authorizing the clerk to discharge the lien. The county clerk shall record a memorandum of the certificate and the date on which it is filed. The filing of the certificate and recording of the memorandum discharge the lien.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533.005. EASEMENTS. The department, in coordination with the executive commissioner, may grant a temporary or permanent easement or right-of-way on land held by the department that relates to services provided under this title. The department, in coordination with the executive commissioner, must grant an easement or right-of-way on terms and conditions the executive commissioner considers to be in the state's best interest.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1175, Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533.007. USE OF CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION. (a) Subject to the requirements of Chapter 250, the department, in relation to services provided under this title, or a local mental health authority or community center, may deny employment or volunteer status to an applicant if:

(1) the department, authority, or community center determines that the applicant's criminal history record information indicates that the person is not qualified or suitable; or

(2) the applicant fails to provide a complete set of fingerprints if the department establishes that method of obtaining criminal history record information.

(b) The executive commissioner shall adopt rules relating to the use of information obtained under this section, including rules that prohibit an adverse personnel action based on arrest warrant or wanted persons information received by the department.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 6.02, eff. Aug. 30, 1993; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 790, Sec. 46(26), eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1209, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533.0075. EXCHANGE OF EMPLOYMENT RECORDS. The department, in relation to services provided under this title, or a local mental health authority or community center, may exchange with one another the employment records of an employee or former employee who applies for employment at the department, authority, or community center.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 646, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 30, 1993. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1209, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533.008. EMPLOYMENT OPPORTUNITIES FOR INDIVIDUALS WITH MENTAL ILLNESS OR AN INTELLECTUAL DISABILITY. (a) Each department facility and community center shall annually assess the feasibility of converting entry level support positions into employment opportunities for individuals with mental illness or an intellectual disability in the facility's or center's service area.

(b) In making the assessment, the department facility or community center shall consider the feasibility of using an array of job opportunities that may lead to competitive employment, including sheltered employment and supported employment.

(c) Each department facility and community center shall annually submit to the department a report showing that the facility or center has complied with Subsection (a).

(d) The department shall compile information from the reports and shall make the information available to each designated provider in a service area.

(e) Each department facility and community center shall ensure that designated staff are trained to:

(1) assist clients through the Social Security Administration disability determination process;

(2) provide clients and their families information related to the Social Security Administration Work Incentive Provisions; and

(3) assist clients in accessing and utilizing the Social Security Administration Work Incentive Provisions to finance training, services, and supports needed to obtain career goals.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 655, Sec. 6.04, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533.009. EXCHANGE OF PATIENT RECORDS. (a) Department facilities, local mental health authorities, community centers, other designated providers, and subcontractors of mental health services are component parts of one service delivery system within which patient records may be exchanged without the patient's consent.

(b) The executive commissioner shall adopt rules to carry out the purposes of this section.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1209, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533.0095. COLLECTION AND MAINTENANCE OF INFORMATION REGARDING PERSONS FOUND NOT GUILTY BY REASON OF INSANITY. (a) The executive commissioner by rule shall require the department to collect information and maintain current records regarding a person found not guilty of an offense by reason of insanity under Chapter 46C, Code of Criminal Procedure, who is:

(1) ordered by a court to receive inpatient mental health services under Chapter 574 or under Chapter 46C, Code of Criminal Procedure; or

(2) ordered by a court to receive outpatient or community-based treatment and supervision.

(b) Information maintained by the department under this section must include the name and address of any facility to which the person is committed, the length of the person's commitment to the facility, and any post-release outcome.

(c) The department shall file annually with the presiding officer of each house of the legislature a written report containing the name of each person described by Subsection (a), the name and address of any facility to which the person is committed, the length of the person's commitment to the facility, and any post-release outcome.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 831 (S.B. 837), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533.010. INFORMATION RELATING TO CONDITION. (a) A person, including a hospital, nursing facility, medical society, or other organization, may provide to the department or a medical organization, hospital, or hospital committee any information, including interviews, reports, statements, or memoranda relating to a person's condition and treatment for use in a study to reduce mental illness and intellectual disabilities.

(b) The department or a medical organization, hospital, or hospital committee receiving the information may use or publish the information only to advance mental health and intellectual disability research and education in order to reduce mental illness and intellectual disabilities. A summary of the study may be released for general publication.

(c) The identity of a person whose condition or treatment is studied is confidential and may not be revealed under any circumstances. Information provided under this section and any finding or conclusion resulting from the study is privileged information.

(d) A person is not liable for damages or other relief if the person:

(1) provides information under this section;

(2) releases or publishes the findings and conclusions of the person or organization to advance mental health and intellectual disability research and education; or

(3) releases or publishes generally a summary of a study.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533.012. COOPERATION OF STATE AGENCIES. At the department's request and in coordination with the executive commissioner, all state departments, agencies, officers, and employees shall cooperate with the department in activities that are consistent with their functions and that relate to services provided under this title.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 198, Sec. 2.134, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1325, Sec. 13.05, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 281 (H.B. 2702), Sec. 4.03, eff. June 14, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 268 (S.B. 10), Sec. 32(f), eff. September 1, 2008.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533.014. RESPONSIBILITY OF LOCAL MENTAL HEALTH AUTHORITIES IN MAKING TREATMENT RECOMMENDATIONS. (a) The executive commissioner shall adopt rules that:

(1) relate to the responsibility of the local mental health authorities to make recommendations relating to the most appropriate and available treatment alternatives for individuals in need of mental health services, including individuals who are in contact with the criminal justice system and individuals detained in local jails and juvenile detention facilities;

(2) govern commitments to a local mental health authority;

(3) govern transfers of patients that involve a local mental health authority; and

(4) provide for emergency admission to a department mental health facility if obtaining approval from the authority could result in a delay that might endanger the patient or others.

(b) The executive commissioner's first consideration in developing rules under this section must be to satisfy individual patient treatment needs in the most appropriate setting. The executive commissioner shall also consider reducing patient inconvenience resulting from admissions and transfers between providers.

(c) The department shall notify each judge who has probate jurisdiction in the service area and any other person the local mental health authority considers necessary of the responsibility of the local mental health authority to make recommendations relating to the most appropriate and available treatment alternatives and the procedures required in the area.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 646, Sec. 3, eff. Aug. 30, 1993; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 367, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1214, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533.015. UNANNOUNCED INSPECTIONS. The department may make any inspection of a department facility or program under the department's jurisdiction under this title without announcing the inspection.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 531, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 28, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533.016. CERTAIN PROCUREMENTS OF GOODS AND SERVICES BY SERVICE PROVIDERS.

Text of subsection effective until April 01, 2025

(a) This section does not apply to a "health and human services agency," as that term is defined by Section 531.001, Government Code.

Text of subsection effective on April 01, 2025

(a) This section does not apply to a "health and human services agency," as that term is defined by Section 521.0001, Government Code.

(a-1) A state agency, local agency, or local mental health authority that expends public money to acquire goods or services in connection with providing or coordinating the provision of mental health services may satisfy the requirements of any state law requiring procurements by competitive bidding or competitive sealed proposals by procuring goods or services with the public money in accordance with Section 533.017 or in accordance with:

(1) Section 32.043 or 32.044, Human Resources Code, if the entity is a public hospital subject to those laws; or

(2) this section, if the entity is not covered by Subdivision (1).

(b) An agency or authority under Subsection (a-1)(2) may acquire goods or services by any procurement method that provides the best value to the agency or authority. The agency or authority shall document that the agency or authority considered all relevant factors under Subsection (c) in making the acquisition.

(c) Subject to Subsection (d), the agency or authority may consider all relevant factors in determining the best value, including:

(1) any installation costs;

(2) the delivery terms;

(3) the quality and reliability of the vendor's goods or services;

(4) the extent to which the goods or services meet the agency's or authority's needs;

(5) indicators of probable vendor performance under the contract such as past vendor performance, the vendor's financial resources and ability to perform, the vendor's experience and responsibility, and the vendor's ability to provide reliable maintenance agreements;

(6) the impact on the ability of the agency or authority to comply with laws and rules relating to historically underutilized businesses or relating to the procurement of goods and services from persons with disabilities;

(7) the total long-term cost to the agency or authority of acquiring the vendor's goods or services;

(8) the cost of any employee training associated with the acquisition;

(9) the effect of an acquisition on the agency's or authority's productivity;

(10) the acquisition price; and

(11) any other factor relevant to determining the best value for the agency or authority in the context of a particular acquisition.

(d) If a state agency to which this section applies acquires goods or services with a value that exceeds $100,000, the state agency shall consult with and receive approval from the commission before considering factors other than price and meeting specifications.

(e) The state auditor or the executive commissioner may audit the agency's or authority's acquisitions of goods and services under this section to the extent state money or federal money appropriated by the state is used to make the acquisitions.

(f) The agency or authority may adopt rules and procedures for the acquisition of goods and services under this section.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1045, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 2.54, eff. April 1, 2025.

Sec. 533.017. PARTICIPATION IN PURCHASING CONTRACTS OR GROUP PURCHASING PROGRAM.

Text of subsection effective until April 01, 2025

(a) This section does not apply to a "health and human services agency," as that term is defined by Section 531.001, Government Code.

Text of subsection effective on April 01, 2025

(a) This section does not apply to a "health and human services agency," as that term is defined by Section 521.0001, Government Code.

(b) The executive commissioner may allow a state agency, local agency, or local mental health authority that expends public money to purchase goods or services in connection with providing or coordinating the provision of mental health services to purchase goods or services with the public money by participating in:

(1) a contract the executive commissioner has made to purchase goods or services; or

(2) a group purchasing program established or designated by the executive commissioner that offers discounts to providers of mental health services.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1045, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 2.55, eff. April 1, 2025.

SUBCHAPTER B. POWERS AND DUTIES RELATING TO PROVISION OF MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES

Sec. 533.031. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Elderly resident" means a person 65 years of age or older residing in a department facility.

(2) "Extended care unit" means a residential unit in a department facility that contains patients with chronic mental illness who require long-term care, maintenance, limited programming, and constant supervision.

(3) "Transitional living unit" means a residential unit that is designed for the primary purpose of facilitating the return of hard-to-place psychiatric patients with chronic mental illness from acute care units to the community through an array of services appropriate for those patients.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 478 (H.B. 2439), Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 2007.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533.032. LONG-RANGE PLANNING.

Text of subsection effective until April 01, 2025

(a) The department shall have a long-range plan relating to the provision of services under this title covering at least six years that includes at least the provisions required by Section 531.023, Government Code, and Chapter 2056, Government Code. The plan must cover the provision of services in and policies for state-operated institutions and ensure that the medical needs of the most medically fragile persons with mental illness the department serves are met.

Text of subsection effective on April 01, 2025

(a) The department shall have a long-range plan relating to the provision of services under this title covering at least six years that includes at least the provisions required by Sections 525.0154, 525.0155, and 525.0156, Government Code, and Chapter 2056, Government Code. The plan must cover the provision of services in and policies for state-operated institutions and ensure that the medical needs of the most medically fragile persons with mental illness the department serves are met.

(b) In developing the plan, the department shall:

(1) solicit input from:

(A) local mental health authorities;

(B) community representatives;

(C) consumers of mental health services, including consumers of campus-based and community-based services, and family members of consumers of those services; and

(D) other interested persons; and

(2) consider the report developed under Subsection (c).

(c) The department shall develop a report containing information and recommendations regarding the most efficient long-term use and management of the department's campus-based facilities. The report must:

(1) project future bed requirements for state hospitals;

(2) document the methodology used to develop the projection of future bed requirements;

(3) project maintenance costs for institutional facilities;

(4) recommend strategies to maximize the use of institutional facilities; and

(5) specify how each state hospital will:

(A) serve and support the communities and consumers in its service area; and

(B) fulfill statewide needs for specialized services.

(d) In developing the report under Subsection (c), the department shall:

(1) conduct two public meetings, one meeting to be held at the beginning of the process and the second meeting to be held at the end of the process, to receive comments from interested parties; and

(2) consider:

(A) the medical needs of the most medically fragile of its patients with mental illness; and

(B) input solicited from consumers of services of state hospitals.

(g) The department shall:

(1) attach the report required by Subsection (c) to the department's legislative appropriations request for each biennium;

(2) at the time the department presents its legislative appropriations request, present the report to the:

(A) governor;

(B) governor's budget office;

(C) lieutenant governor;

(D) speaker of the house of representatives;

(E) Legislative Budget Board; and

(F) commission; and

(3) update the department's long-range plan biennially and include the report in the plan.

(h) The department shall, in coordination with the commission, evaluate the current and long-term costs associated with serving inpatient psychiatric needs of persons living in counties now served by at least three state hospitals within 120 miles of one another. This evaluation shall take into consideration the condition of the physical plants and other long-term asset management issues associated with the operation of the hospitals, as well as other issues associated with quality psychiatric care. After such determination is made, the commission shall begin to take action to influence the utilization of these state hospitals in order to ensure efficient service delivery.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 646, Sec. 4, eff. Aug. 30, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 5.95(103), eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1187, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1050 (S.B. 71), Sec. 12, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1050 (S.B. 71), Sec. 22(8), eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1083 (S.B. 1179), Sec. 25(91), eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1083 (S.B. 1179), Sec. 25(91), eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 10.004, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 2.56, eff. April 1, 2025.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1147 (S.B. 956), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 533.0325. CONTINUUM OF SERVICES IN CAMPUS FACILITIES. The executive commissioner by rule shall establish criteria regarding the uses of the department's campus-based facilities as part of a full continuum of services under this title.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1187, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533.033. DETERMINATION OF REQUIRED RANGE OF MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES. (a) Consistent with the purposes and policies of this subtitle, the commissioner biennially shall determine:

(1) the types of mental health services that can be most economically and effectively provided at the community level for persons exhibiting various forms of mental disability; and

(2) the types of mental health services that can be most economically and effectively provided by department facilities.

(b) In the determination, the commissioner shall assess the limits, if any, that should be placed on the duration of mental health services provided at the community level or at a department facility.

(c) The department biennially shall review the types of services the department provides and shall determine if a community provider can provide services of a comparable quality at a lower cost than the department's costs.

(d) The commissioner's findings shall guide the department in planning and administering services for persons with mental illness.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1050 (S.B. 71), Sec. 22(9), eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1083 (S.B. 1179), Sec. 25(92), eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533.034. AUTHORITY TO CONTRACT FOR COMMUNITY-BASED SERVICES. The department may cooperate, negotiate, and contract with local agencies, hospitals, private organizations and foundations, community centers, physicians, and other persons to plan, develop, and provide community-based mental health services.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 198, Sec. 2.73, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533.0345. STATE AGENCY SERVICES STANDARDS. (a) The executive commissioner by rule shall develop model program standards for mental health services for use by each state agency that provides or pays for mental health services. The department shall provide the model standards to each agency that provides mental health services as identified by the commission.

(b) Model standards developed under Subsection (a) must be designed to improve the consistency of mental health services provided by or through a state agency.

(c) Biennially the department shall review the model standards developed under Subsection (a) and determine whether each standard contributes effectively to the consistency of service delivery by state agencies.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1187, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533.035. LOCAL MENTAL HEALTH AUTHORITIES. (a) The executive commissioner shall designate a local mental health authority in one or more local service areas. The executive commissioner may delegate to the local authority the authority and responsibility of the executive commissioner, the commission, or a department of the commission related to planning, policy development, coordination, including coordination with criminal justice entities, resource allocation, and resource development for and oversight of mental health services in the most appropriate and available setting to meet individual needs in that service area. The executive commissioner may designate a single entity as both the local mental health authority under this chapter and the local intellectual and developmental disability authority under Chapter 533A for a service area.

(b) The department by contract or other method of allocation, including a case-rate or capitated arrangement, may disburse to a local mental health authority department federal and department state funds to be spent in the local service area for:

(1) community mental health and intellectual disability services; and

(2) chemical dependency services for persons who are dually diagnosed as having both chemical dependency and mental illness or an intellectual disability.

(c) A local mental health authority, with the approval of the department, shall use the funds received under Subsection (b) to ensure mental health and chemical dependency services are provided in the local service area. The local authority shall consider public input, ultimate cost-benefit, and client care issues to ensure consumer choice and the best use of public money in:

(1) assembling a network of service providers;

(2) making recommendations relating to the most appropriate and available treatment alternatives for individuals in need of mental health services; and

(3) procuring services for a local service area, including a request for proposal or open-enrollment procurement method.

(d) A local mental health authority shall demonstrate to the department that the services that the authority provides directly or through subcontractors and that involve state funds comply with relevant state standards.

(e) Subject to Section 533.0358, in assembling a network of service providers, a local mental health authority may serve as a provider of services only as a provider of last resort and only if the local authority demonstrates to the department in the local authority's local network development plan that:

(1) the local authority has made every reasonable attempt to solicit the development of an available and appropriate provider base that is sufficient to meet the needs of consumers in its service area; and

(2) there is not a willing provider of the relevant services in the local authority's service area or in the county where the provision of the services is needed.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 6.03, eff. Aug. 30, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 821, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 869, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1209, Sec. 14, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 367, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 198, Sec. 2.74, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 478 (H.B. 2439), Sec. 2, eff. June 16, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 478 (H.B. 2439), Sec. 7, eff. June 16, 2007.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533.0351. REQUIRED COMPOSITION OF LOCAL MENTAL HEALTH AUTHORITY GOVERNING BODY. (a) If a local mental health authority has a governing body, the governing body must include:

(1) for a local authority that serves only one county, the sheriff of the county as an ex officio nonvoting member; and

(2) for a local authority that serves two or more counties, two sheriffs chosen in accordance with Subsection (b) as ex officio nonvoting members.

(b) A local mental health authority that serves two or more counties shall take the median population size of each of those counties and choose:

(1) one sheriff of a county with a population above the median population size to serve as an ex officio nonvoting member under Subsection (a); and

(2) one sheriff of a county with a population below the median population size to serve as an ex officio nonvoting member under Subsection (a).

(c) A sheriff may designate a representative to serve in the sheriff's place as an ex officio nonvoting member under Subsection (a). Except as provided by Subsection (c-1), a sheriff or representative of the sheriff serves as an ex officio nonvoting member under Subsection (a) for the duration of the applicable sheriff's term in office.

(c-1) A local mental health authority may rotate the positions of ex officio nonvoting members as chosen in accordance with Subsection (b) among the other sheriffs of the counties served by the local authority. A local authority shall consult with each sheriff of the counties served by the local authority in rotating the positions of ex officio nonvoting members under this subsection.

(d) A local mental health authority may not bar or restrict a sheriff or representative of a sheriff who serves as an ex officio nonvoting member under Subsection (a) from speaking or providing input at a meeting of the local authority's governing body.

(e) If a local mental health authority does not have a governing body, the local authority shall:

(1) for a local authority that serves only one county, consult with the sheriff of the county or a representative of the sheriff regarding the use of funds received under Section 533.035(b); or

(2) for a local authority that serves two or more counties, take the median population size of each of those counties and consult with both:

(A) a sheriff or a representative of a sheriff of a county with a population above the median population size regarding the use of funds received under Section 533.035(b); and

(B) a sheriff or a representative of a sheriff of a county with a population below the median population size regarding the use of funds received under Section 533.035(b).

(f) This section does not prevent a sheriff or representative of a sheriff from being included in the governing body of a local mental health authority as a voting member of the body.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 962 (S.B. 632), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 533.0352. LOCAL AUTHORITY PLANNING FOR LOCAL SERVICE AREA. (a) Each local mental health authority shall develop a local service area plan to maximize the authority's services by using the best and most cost-effective means of using federal, state, and local resources to meet the needs of the local community according to the relative priority of those needs. Each local mental health authority shall undertake to maximize federal funding.

(b) A local service area plan must be consistent with the purposes, goals, and policies stated in Section 531.001 and the department's long-range plan developed under Section 533.032.

(c) The department and a local mental health authority shall use the local authority's local service plan as the basis for contracts between the department and the local authority and for establishing the local authority's responsibility for achieving outcomes related to the needs and characteristics of the authority's local service area.

(d) In developing the local service area plan, the local mental health authority shall:

(1) solicit information regarding community needs from:

(A) representatives of the local community;

(B) consumers of community-based mental health services and members of the families of those consumers;

(C) local law enforcement agencies; and

(D) other interested persons; and

(2) consider:

(A) criteria for assuring accountability for, cost-effectiveness of, and relative value of service delivery options;

(B) goals to minimize the need for state hospital and community hospital care;

(C) goals to divert consumers of services from the criminal justice system;

(D) goals to ensure that a child with mental illness remains with the child's parent or guardian as appropriate to the child's care; and

(E) opportunities for innovation in services and service delivery.

(e) The department and the local mental health authority by contract shall enter into a performance agreement that specifies required standard outcomes for the programs administered by the local authority. Performance related to the specified outcomes must be verifiable by the department. The performance agreement must include measures related to the outputs, costs, and units of service delivered. Information regarding the outputs, costs, and units of service delivered shall be recorded in the local authority's automated data systems, and reports regarding the outputs, costs, and units of service delivered shall be submitted to the department at least annually as provided by department rule.

(f) The department and the local mental health authority shall provide an opportunity for community centers and advocacy groups to provide information or assistance in developing the specified performance outcomes under Subsection (e).

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 358, Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2003.

Renumbered from Health and Safety Code, Section 533.0354 by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 728 (H.B. 2018), Sec. 23.001(52), eff. September 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 962 (S.B. 632), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 533.03521. LOCAL NETWORK DEVELOPMENT PLAN CREATION AND APPROVAL. (a) A local mental health authority shall develop a local network development plan regarding the configuration and development of the local mental health authority's provider network. The plan must reflect local needs and priorities and maximize consumer choice and access to qualified service providers.

(b) The local mental health authority shall submit the local network development plan to the department for approval.

(c) On receipt of a local network development plan under this section, the department shall review the plan to ensure that the plan:

(1) complies with the criteria established by Section 533.0358 if the local mental health authority is providing services under that section; and

(2) indicates that the local mental health authority is reasonably attempting to solicit the development of a provider base that is:

(A) available and appropriate; and

(B) sufficient to meet the needs of consumers in the local authority's local service area.

(d) If the department determines that the local network development plan complies with Subsection (c), the department shall approve the plan.

(e) At least biennially, the department shall review a local mental health authority's local network development plan and determine whether the plan complies with Subsection (c).

(f) As part of a local network development plan, a local mental health authority annually shall post on the local authority's website a list of persons with whom the local authority had a contract or agreement in effect during all or part of the previous year, or on the date the list is posted, related to the provision of mental health services.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 478 (H.B. 2439), Sec. 4, eff. June 16, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533.0354. DISEASE MANAGEMENT PRACTICES AND JAIL DIVERSION MEASURES OF LOCAL MENTAL HEALTH AUTHORITIES. (a) A local mental health authority shall ensure the provision of assessment services, crisis services, and intensive and comprehensive services using disease management practices for adults with bipolar disorder, schizophrenia, or clinically severe depression and for children with serious emotional illnesses. The local mental health authority shall ensure that individuals are engaged with treatment services that are:

(1) ongoing and matched to the needs of the individual in type, duration, and intensity;

(2) focused on a process of recovery designed to allow the individual to progress through levels of service;

(3) guided by evidence-based protocols and a strength-based paradigm of service; and

(4) monitored by a system that holds the local authority accountable for specific outcomes, while allowing flexibility to maximize local resources.

(a-1) In addition to the services required under Subsection (a) and using money appropriated for that purpose or money received under the Texas Health Care Transformation and Quality Improvement Program waiver issued under Section 1115 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Section 1315), a local mental health authority may ensure, to the extent feasible, the provision of assessment services, crisis services, and intensive and comprehensive services using disease management practices for children with serious emotional, behavioral, or mental disturbance not described by Subsection (a) and adults with severe mental illness who are experiencing significant functional impairment due to a mental health disorder not described by Subsection (a) that is defined by the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, 5th Edition (DSM-5), including:

(1) major depressive disorder, including single episode or recurrent major depressive disorder;

(2) post-traumatic stress disorder;

(3) schizoaffective disorder, including bipolar and depressive types;

(4) obsessive-compulsive disorder;

(5) anxiety disorder;

(6) attention deficit disorder;

(7) delusional disorder;

(8) bulimia nervosa, anorexia nervosa, or other eating disorders not otherwise specified; or

(9) any other diagnosed mental health disorder.

(a-2) The local mental health authority shall ensure that individuals described by Subsection (a-1) are engaged with treatment services in a clinically appropriate manner.

(b) The department shall require each local mental health authority to incorporate jail diversion strategies into the authority's disease management practices for managing adults with schizophrenia and bipolar disorder to reduce the involvement of those client populations with the criminal justice system.

(b-1) The department shall require each local mental health authority to incorporate jail diversion strategies into the authority's disease management practices to reduce the involvement of the criminal justice system in managing adults with the following disorders as defined by the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, 5th Edition (DSM-5), who are not described by Subsection (b):

(1) post-traumatic stress disorder;

(2) schizoaffective disorder, including bipolar and depressive types;

(3) anxiety disorder; or

(4) delusional disorder.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 198, Sec. 2.75, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1083 (S.B. 1179), Sec. 25(93), eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1306 (H.B. 3793), Sec. 2, eff. January 1, 2014.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1310 (S.B. 7), Sec. 6.06, eff. January 1, 2014.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533.0356. LOCAL BEHAVIORAL HEALTH AUTHORITIES. (a) The department may designate a local behavioral health authority in a local service area to provide mental health and chemical dependency services in that area. The department may delegate to an authority designated under this section the authority and responsibility for planning, policy development, coordination, resource allocation, and resource development for and oversight of mental health and chemical dependency services in that service area. An authority designated under this section has:

(1) all the responsibilities and duties of a local mental health authority provided by Section 533.035 and by Subchapter B, Chapter 534; and

(2) the responsibility and duty to ensure that chemical dependency services are provided in the service area as described by the statewide service delivery plan adopted under Section 461A.056.

(c) In the planning and implementation of services, the authority shall give proportionate priority to mental health services and chemical dependency services that ensures that funds purchasing services are used in accordance with specific regulatory and statutory requirements that govern the respective funds.

(d) A local mental health authority may apply to the department for designation as a local behavioral health authority.

(e) The department, by contract or by a case-rate or capitated arrangement or another method of allocation, may disburse money, including federal money, to a local behavioral health authority for services.

(f) A local behavioral health authority, with the approval of the department as provided by contract, shall use money received under Subsection (e) to ensure that mental health and chemical dependency services are provided in the local service area at the same level as the level of services previously provided through:

(1) the local mental health authority; and

(2) the department.

(g) In determining whether to designate a local behavioral health authority for a service area and in determining the functions of the authority if designated, the department shall solicit and consider written comments from any interested person including community representatives, persons who are consumers of the proposed services of the authority, and family members of those consumers.

(h) An authority designated under this section shall demonstrate to the department that services involving state funds that the authority oversees comply with relevant state standards.

(i) The executive commissioner may adopt rules to govern the operations of local behavioral health authorities. The department may assign the local behavioral health authority the duty of providing a single point of entry for mental health and chemical dependency services.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1187, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533.0357. BEST PRACTICES CLEARINGHOUSE FOR LOCAL MENTAL HEALTH AUTHORITIES. (a) In coordination with local mental health authorities, the department shall establish an online clearinghouse of information relating to best practices of local mental health authorities regarding the provision of mental health services, development of a local provider network, and achievement of the best return on public investment in mental health services.

(b) The department shall solicit and collect from local mental health authorities that meet established outcome and performance measures, community centers, consumers and advocates with expertise in mental health or in the provision of mental health services, and other local entities concerned with mental health issues examples of best practices related to:

(1) developing and implementing a local network development plan;

(2) assembling and expanding a local provider network to increase consumer choice;

(3) creating and enforcing performance standards for providers;

(4) managing limited resources;

(5) maximizing available funding;

(6) producing the best client outcomes;

(7) ensuring consumers of mental health services have control over decisions regarding their health;

(8) developing procurement processes to protect public funds;

(9) achieving the best mental health consumer outcomes possible; and

(10) implementing strategies that effectively incorporate consumer and family involvement to develop and evaluate the provider network.

(c) The department may contract for the services of one or more contractors to develop, implement, and maintain a system of collecting and evaluating the best practices of local mental health authorities as provided by this section.

(d) The department shall encourage local mental health authorities that successfully implement best practices in accordance with this section to mentor local mental health authorities that have service deficiencies.

(e) Before the executive commissioner may remove a local mental health authority's designation under Section 533.035(a) as a local mental health authority, the executive commissioner shall:

(1) assist the local mental health authority in attaining training and mentorship in using the best practices established in accordance with this section; and

(2) track and document the local mental health authority's improvements in the provision of service or continued service deficiencies.

(f) Subsection (e) does not apply to the removal of a local mental health authority's designation initiated at the request of a local government official who has responsibility for the provision of mental health services.

(g) The department shall implement this section using only existing resources.

(h) The department shall ensure that a local mental health authority providing best practices information to the department or mentoring another local mental health authority complies with Section 533.03521(f).

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 478 (H.B. 2439), Sec. 6, eff. June 16, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533.0358. LOCAL MENTAL HEALTH AUTHORITY'S PROVISION OF SERVICES AS PROVIDER OF LAST RESORT. (a) A local mental health authority may serve as a provider of services under Section 533.035(e) only if, through the local network development plan process, the local authority determines that at least one of the following applies:

(1) interested qualified service providers are not available to provide services or no service provider meets the local authority's procurement requirements;

(2) the local authority's network of providers does not provide a minimum level of consumer choice by:

(A) presenting consumers with two or more qualified service providers in the local authority's network for service packages; and

(B) presenting consumers with two or more qualified service providers in the local authority's network for specific services within a service package;

(3) the local authority's provider network does not provide consumers in the local service area with access to services at least equal to the level of access provided as of a date the executive commissioner specifies;

(4) the combined volume of services delivered by qualified service providers in the local network does not meet all of the local authority's service capacity for each service package identified in the local network development plan;

(5) the performance of the services by the local authority is necessary to preserve critical infrastructure and ensure continuous provision of services; or

(6) existing contracts or other agreements restrict the local authority from contracting with qualified service providers for services in the local network development plan.

(b) If a local mental health authority continues to provide services in accordance with this section, the local authority shall identify in the local authority's local network development plan:

(1) the proportion of its local network services that the local authority will provide; and

(2) the local authority's basis for its determination that the local authority must continue to provide services.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 478 (H.B. 2439), Sec. 6, eff. June 16, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533.0359. RULEMAKING FOR LOCAL MENTAL HEALTH AUTHORITIES. (a) In developing rules governing local mental health authorities under Sections 533.035, 533.03521, 533.0357, and 533.0358, the executive commissioner shall use rulemaking procedures under Subchapter B, Chapter 2001, Government Code.

(b) The executive commissioner by rule shall prohibit a trustee or employee of a local mental health authority from soliciting or accepting from another person a benefit, including a security or stock, a gift, or another item of value, that is intended to influence the person's conduct of authority business.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 478 (H.B. 2439), Sec. 6, eff. June 16, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 946 (S.B. 277), Sec. 1.05(b), eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 533.037. SERVICE PROGRAMS AND SHELTERED WORKSHOPS. (a) The department may provide mental health services through halfway houses, sheltered workshops, community centers, and other mental health services programs.

(b) The department may operate or contract for the provision of part or all of the sheltered workshop services and may contract for the sale of goods produced and services provided by a sheltered workshop program. The goods and services may be sold for cash or on credit.

(c) An operating fund may be established for each sheltered workshop the department operates. Each operating fund must be in a national or state bank that is a member of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

(d) Money derived from gifts or grants received for sheltered workshop purposes and the proceeds from the sale of sheltered workshop goods and services shall be deposited to the credit of the operating fund. The money in the fund may be spent only in the operation of the sheltered workshop to:

(1) purchase supplies, materials, services, and equipment;

(2) pay salaries of and wages to participants and employees;

(3) construct, maintain, repair, and renovate facilities and equipment; and

(4) establish and maintain a petty cash fund of not more than $100.

(e) Money in an operating fund that is used to pay salaries of and wages to participants in the sheltered workshop program is money the department holds in trust for the participants' benefit.

(f) This section does not affect the authority or jurisdiction of a community center as prescribed by Chapter 534.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533.040. SERVICES FOR CHILDREN AND YOUTH. (a) The department shall ensure the development of programs and the expansion of services at the community level for children with mental illness, or with a dual diagnosis of mental illness and an intellectual disability, and for their families. The department shall:

(1) prepare and review budgets for services for children;

(2) develop departmental policies relating to children's programs and service delivery; and

(3) increase interagency coordination activities to enhance the provision of services for children.

(b) The department shall designate an employee authorized in the department's schedule of exempt positions to be responsible for planning and coordinating services and programs for children and youth. The employee shall perform budget and policy review and provide interagency coordination of services for children and youth.

(c) The department shall designate an employee as a youth suicide prevention officer. The officer shall serve as a liaison to the Texas Education Agency and public schools on matters relating to the prevention of and response to suicide or attempted suicide by public school students.

(d) The department and the Department of Assistive and Rehabilitative Services shall:

(1) jointly develop:

(A) a continuum of care for children younger than seven years of age who have mental illness; and

(B) a plan to increase the expertise of the department's service providers in mental health issues involving children younger than seven years of age; and

(2) coordinate, if practicable, the departments' activities and services involving children with mental illness and their families.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 6.46, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 57, Sec. 1, eff. May 15, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533.0415. MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING ON INTERAGENCY TRAINING. (a) The executive commissioner, the Texas Juvenile Justice Department, and the Texas Education Agency by rule shall adopt a joint memorandum of understanding to develop interagency training for the staffs of the department, the Texas Juvenile Justice Department, the Department of Family and Protective Services, and the Texas Education Agency who are involved in the functions of assessment, case planning, case management, and in-home or direct delivery of services to children, youth, and their families under this title. The memorandum must:

(1) outline the responsibility of each agency in coordinating and developing a plan for interagency training on individualized assessment and effective intervention and treatment services for children and dysfunctional families; and

(2) provide for the establishment of an interagency task force to:

(A) develop a training program to include identified competencies, content, and hours for completion of the training with at least 20 hours of training required each year until the program is completed;

(B) design a plan for implementing the program, including regional site selection, frequency of training, and selection of experienced clinical public and private professionals or consultants to lead the training; and

(C) monitor, evaluate, and revise the training program, including the development of additional curricula based on future training needs identified by staff and professionals.

(b) The task force consists of:

(1) one clinical professional and one training staff member from each agency, appointed by that agency; and

(2) 10 private sector clinical professionals with expertise in dealing with troubled children, youth, and dysfunctional families, two of whom are appointed by each agency.

(c) The task force shall meet at the call of the department.

(d) The commission shall act as the lead agency in coordinating the development and implementation of the memorandum.

(e) The executive commissioner and the agencies shall review and by rule revise the memorandum not later than August each year.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 6.04, eff. Aug. 30, 1993. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 6.47, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1050 (S.B. 71), Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1083 (S.B. 1179), Sec. 15, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533.042. EVALUATION OF ELDERLY RESIDENTS. (a) The department shall evaluate each elderly resident at least annually to determine if the resident can be appropriately served in a less restrictive setting.

(b) The department shall consider the proximity to the resident of family, friends, and advocates concerned with the resident's well-being in determining whether the resident should be moved from a department facility or to a different department facility. The department shall recognize that a nursing facility may not be able to meet the special needs of an elderly resident.

(c) In evaluating an elderly resident under this section and to ensure appropriate placement, the department shall identify the special needs of the resident, the types of services that will best meet those needs, and the type of facility that will best provide those services.

(d) The treating physician shall conduct the evaluation of an elderly resident of a department facility.

(e) The department shall attempt to place an elderly resident in a less restrictive setting if the department determines that the resident can be appropriately served in that setting. The department shall coordinate the attempt with the local mental health authority.

(f) A local mental health authority shall provide continuing care for an elderly resident placed in the authority's service area under this section.

(g) The local mental health authority shall have the right of access to all residents and records of residents who request continuing care services.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 646, Sec. 5, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533.043. PROPOSALS FOR GERIATRIC, EXTENDED, AND TRANSITIONAL CARE. (a) The department shall solicit proposals from community providers to operate:

(1) community residential programs that will provide at least the same services that an extended care unit provides for the population the provider proposes to serve; or

(2) transitional living units that will provide at least the same services that the department traditionally provides in facility-based transitional care units.

(b) The department shall solicit proposals from community providers to operate community residential programs for elderly residents at least every two years.

(c) A proposal for extended care services may be designed to serve all or part of an extended care unit's population.

(d) A proposal to operate transitional living units may provide that the community provider operate the transitional living unit in a community setting or on the grounds of a department facility.

(e) The department shall require each provider to:

(1) offer adequate assurances of ability to:

(A) provide the required services;

(B) meet department standards; and

(C) safeguard the safety and well-being of each resident; and

(2) sign a memorandum of agreement with the local mental health authority outlining the responsibilities for continuity of care and monitoring, if the provider is not the local authority.

(f) The department may fund a proposal through a contract if the provider agrees to meet the requirements prescribed by Subsection (e) and agrees to provide the services at a cost that is equal to or less than the cost to the department to provide the services.

(g) The appropriate local mental health authority shall monitor the services provided to a resident placed in a program funded under this section. The department may monitor any service for which it contracts.

(h) The department is responsible for the care of a patient in an extended care program funded under this section. The department may terminate a contract for extended care services if the program ends or does not provide the required services. The department shall provide the services or find another program to provide the services if the department terminates a contract.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533.051. ALLOCATION OF OUTPATIENT MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES AND BEDS IN STATE HOSPITALS. (a) To ensure the appropriate and timely provision of mental health services to patients who voluntarily receive those services or who are ordered by a court to receive those services in civil or criminal proceedings, the department, in conjunction with the commission, shall plan for the proper and separate allocation of outpatient or community-based mental health services provided by secure and nonsecure outpatient facilities that provide residential care alternatives and mental health services and for the proper and separate allocation of beds in the state hospitals for the following two groups of patients:

(1) patients who are voluntarily receiving outpatient or community-based mental health services, voluntarily admitted to a state hospital under Chapter 572, admitted to a state hospital for emergency detention under Chapter 573, or ordered by a court under Chapter 574 to receive inpatient mental health services at a state hospital or outpatient mental health services from an outpatient facility that provides residential care alternatives and mental health services; and

(2) patients who are ordered to participate in an outpatient treatment program to attain competency to stand trial under Chapter 46B, Code of Criminal Procedure, or committed to a state hospital or other facility to attain competency to stand trial under Chapter 46B, Code of Criminal Procedure, or to receive inpatient mental health services following an acquittal by reason of insanity under Chapter 46C, Code of Criminal Procedure.

(b) The plan developed by the department under Subsection (a) must include:

(1) a determination of the needs for outpatient mental health services of the two groups of patients described by Subsection (a);

(2) a determination of the minimum number of beds that the state hospital system must maintain to adequately serve the two groups of patients;

(3) a statewide plan for and the allocation of sufficient funds for meeting the outpatient mental health service needs of and for the maintenance of beds by the state hospitals for the two groups of patients; and

(4) a process to address and develop, without adverse impact to local service areas, the accessibility and availability of sufficient outpatient mental health services provided to and beds provided by the state hospitals to the two groups of patients based on the success of contractual outcomes with mental health service providers and facilities under Sections 533.034 and 533.052.

(c) To assist in the development of the plan under Subsection (a), the department shall establish and meet at least monthly with an advisory panel composed of the following persons:

(1) one representative designated by the Texas Department of Criminal Justice;

(2) one representative designated by the Texas Association of Counties;

(3) two representatives designated by the Texas Council of Community Centers, including one representative of an urban local service area and one representative of a rural local service area;

(4) two representatives designated by the County Judges and Commissioners Association of Texas, including one representative who is the presiding judge of a court with jurisdiction over mental health matters;

(5) one representative designated by the Sheriffs' Association of Texas;

(6) two representatives designated by the Texas Municipal League, including one representative who is a municipal law enforcement official;

(7) one representative designated by the Texas Conference of Urban Counties;

(8) two representatives designated by the Texas Hospital Association, including one representative who is a physician;

(9) one representative designated by the Texas Catalyst for Empowerment; and

(10) four representatives designated by the department's Council for Advising and Planning for the Prevention and Treatment of Mental and Substance Use Disorders, including:

(A) the chair of the council;

(B) one representative of the council's members who is a consumer of or advocate for mental health services;

(C) one representative of the council's members who is a consumer of or advocate for substance abuse treatment; and

(D) one representative of the council's members who is a family member of or advocate for persons with mental health and substance abuse disorders.

(d) In developing the plan under Subsection (a), the department and advisory panel shall consider:

(1) needs for outpatient mental health services of the two groups of patients described by Subsection (a);

(2) the frequency of use of beds and the historical patterns of use of beds in the state hospitals and other facilities by the two groups of patients;

(3) local needs and demands for outpatient mental health services by the two groups of patients;

(4) local needs and demands for beds in the state hospitals and other facilities for the two groups of patients;

(5) the availability of outpatient mental health service providers and inpatient mental health facilities that may be contracted with to provide outpatient mental health services and beds for the two groups of patients;

(6) the differences between the two groups of patients with regard to:

(A) admission to and discharge from a state hospital or outpatient facility;

(B) rapid stabilization and discharge to the community;

(C) length of stay in a state hospital or outpatient facility;

(D) disputes arising from the determination of a patient's length of stay in a state hospital by a health maintenance organization or a managed care organization;

(E) third-party billing; and

(F) legal challenges or requirements related to the examination and treatment of the patients; and

(7) public input provided to the department or advisory panel in a form and at a time and place that is effective and appropriate and in a manner that complies with any applicable laws, including administrative rules.

(e) The department shall update the plan biennially.

(i) While the plan required by Subsection (a) is being developed and implemented, the department may not, pursuant to any rule, contract, or directive, impose a sanction, penalty, or fine on a local mental health authority for the authority's noncompliance with any methodology or standard adopted or applied by the department relating to the allocation of beds by authorities for the two groups of patients described by Subsection (a).

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1306 (H.B. 3793), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533.0515. REGIONAL ALLOCATION OF MENTAL HEALTH BEDS. (a) In this section, "inpatient mental health facility" has the meaning assigned by Section 571.003.

(b) The commission, with input from local mental health authorities, local behavioral health authorities, stakeholders, and the forensic director appointed under Section 532.013, and after considering any plan developed under Section 533.051, shall divide the state into regions for the purpose of allocating to each region state-funded beds in the state hospitals and other inpatient mental health facilities for patients who are:

(1) voluntarily admitted to a state hospital or other inpatient mental health facility under Subchapter B, Chapter 462, or Chapter 572;

(2) admitted to a state hospital or other inpatient mental health facility for emergency detention under Subchapter C, Chapter 462, or Chapter 573;

(3) ordered by a court to receive at a state hospital or other inpatient mental health facility inpatient chemical dependency treatment under Subchapter D, Chapter 462, or inpatient mental health services under Chapter 574;

(4) committed to a state hospital or other inpatient mental health facility to attain competency to stand trial under Chapter 46B, Code of Criminal Procedure; or

(5) committed to a state hospital or other inpatient mental health facility to receive inpatient mental health services following an acquittal by reason of insanity under Chapter 46C, Code of Criminal Procedure.

(c) The department, in conjunction with the commission, shall convene the advisory panel described by Section 533.051(c) at least quarterly in order for the advisory panel to:

(1) develop, make recommendations to the executive commissioner or department, as appropriate, and monitor the implementation of updates to:

(A) a bed day allocation methodology for allocating to each region designated under Subsection (b) a certain number of state-funded beds in state hospitals and other inpatient mental health facilities for the patients described by Subsection (b) based on the identification and evaluation of factors that impact the use of state-funded beds by patients in a region, including clinical acuity, the prevalence of serious mental illness, and the availability of resources in the region; and

(B) a bed day utilization review protocol that includes a peer review process to:

(i) evaluate:

(a) the use of state-funded beds in state hospitals and other inpatient mental health facilities by patients described by Subsection (b);

(b) alternatives to hospitalization for those patients;

(c) the readmission rate for those patients; and

(d) the average length of admission for those patients; and

(ii) conduct a review of the diagnostic and acuity profiles of patients described by Subsection (b) for the purpose of assisting the department, commission, and advisory panel in making informed decisions and using available resources efficiently and effectively; and

(2) receive and review status updates from the department regarding the implementation of the bed day allocation methodology and the bed day utilization review protocol.

(d) Not later than December 1 of each even-numbered year, the advisory panel shall submit to the executive commissioner for consideration a proposal for an updated bed day allocation methodology and bed day utilization review protocol, and the executive commissioner shall adopt an updated bed day allocation methodology and bed day utilization review protocol.

(e) Not later than December 1 of each even-numbered year, the department, in conjunction with the commission and the advisory panel, shall prepare and submit to the governor, the lieutenant governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, the senate finance committee, the house appropriations committee, and the standing committees of the legislature having jurisdiction over mental health and human services a report that includes:

(1) a summary of the activities of the commission, department, and advisory panel to develop or update the bed day allocation methodology and bed day utilization review protocol;

(2) the outcomes of the implementation of the bed day allocation methodology by region, including an explanation of how the actual outcomes aligned with or differed from the expected outcomes;

(3) for planning purposes, for each region, the actual value of a bed day for the two years preceding the date of the report and the projected value of a bed day for the five years following the date of the report, as calculated by the department;

(4) for each region, an evaluation of the factors in Subsection (c)(1)(A), including the availability of resources in the region, that impact the use of state-funded beds in state hospitals and other inpatient mental health facilities by the patients described by Subsection (b);

(5) the outcomes of the implementation of the bed day utilization review protocol and the impact of the use of the protocol on the use of state-funded beds in state hospitals and other inpatient mental health facilities by the patients described by Subsection (b); and

(6) any recommendations of the department, commission, or advisory panel to enhance the effective and efficient allocation of state-funded beds in state hospitals and other inpatient mental health facilities for the patients described by Subsection (b).

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 207 (S.B. 1507), Sec. 2, eff. May 28, 2015.

Sec. 533.052. CONTRACTING WITH CERTAIN MENTAL HEALTH SERVICE PROVIDERS AND FACILITIES TO PROVIDE SERVICES AND BEDS FOR CERTAIN PERSONS. The department shall make every effort, through collaboration and contractual arrangements with local mental health authorities, to contract with and use a broad base of local community outpatient mental health service providers and inpatient mental health facilities, as appropriate, to make available a sufficient and appropriately located amount of outpatient mental health services and a sufficient and appropriately located number of beds in inpatient mental health facilities, as specified in the plan developed by the department under Section 533.051, to ensure the appropriate and timely provision of mental health services to the two groups of patients described by Section 533.051(a).

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1306 (H.B. 3793), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533.053. INFORMING COURTS OF COMMITMENT OPTIONS. The department shall develop and implement a procedure through which a court that has the authority to commit a person who is incompetent to stand trial or who has been acquitted by reason of insanity under Chapters 46B and 46C, Code of Criminal Procedure, is aware of all of the commitment options for the person, including jail diversion and community-based programs.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1306 (H.B. 3793), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER D. POWERS AND DUTIES RELATING TO DEPARTMENT FACILITIES

Sec. 533.081. DEVELOPMENT OF FACILITY BUDGETS. The department, in budgeting for a facility, shall use uniform costs for specific types of services a facility provides unless a legitimate reason exists and is documented for the use of other costs.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533.082. DETERMINATION OF SAVINGS IN FACILITIES. (a) The department shall determine the degree to which the costs of operating department facilities for persons with mental illness in compliance with applicable standards are affected as populations in the facilities fluctuate.

(b) In making the determination, the department shall:

(1) assume that the current level of services and necessary state of repair of the facilities will be maintained; and

(2) include sufficient funds to allow the department to comply with the requirements of litigation and applicable standards.

(c) The department shall allocate to community-based mental health programs any savings realized in operating department facilities for persons with mental illness.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533.083. CRITERIA FOR EXPANSION, CLOSURE, OR CONSOLIDATION OF FACILITY. The department shall establish objective criteria for determining when a new facility may be needed and when a facility may be expanded, closed, or consolidated.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533.084. MANAGEMENT OF SURPLUS REAL PROPERTY. (a) To the extent provided by this subtitle, the department, in coordination with the executive commissioner, may lease, transfer, or otherwise dispose of any surplus real property related to the provision of services under this title, including any improvements under its management and control, or authorize the lease, transfer, or disposal of the property. Surplus property is property the executive commissioner designates as having minimal value to the present service delivery system and projects to have minimal value to the service delivery system as described in the department's long-range plan.

(b) The proceeds from the lease, transfer, or disposal of surplus real property, including any improvements, shall be deposited to the credit of the department in the Texas capital trust fund established under Chapter 2201, Government Code. The proceeds may be appropriated only for improvements to the department's system of mental health facilities.

(c) A lease proposal shall be advertised at least once a week for four consecutive weeks in at least two newspapers. One newspaper must be a newspaper published in the municipality in which the property is located or the daily newspaper published nearest to the property's location. The other newspaper must have statewide circulation. Each lease is subject to the attorney general's approval as to substance and form. The executive commissioner shall adopt forms, rules, and contracts that, in the executive commissioner's best judgment, will protect the state's interests. The executive commissioner may reject any or all bids.

(d) This section does not authorize the executive commissioner or department to close or consolidate a facility used to provide mental health services without first obtaining legislative approval.

(e) Notwithstanding Subsection (c), the executive commissioner, in coordination with the department, may enter into a written agreement with the General Land Office to administer lease proposals. If the General Land Office administers a lease proposal under the agreement, notice that the property is offered for lease must be published in accordance with Section 32.107, Natural Resources Code.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 5.95(5), eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1175, Sec. 2, eff. June 18, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 198, Sec. 2.79, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533.0844. MENTAL HEALTH COMMUNITY SERVICES ACCOUNT. (a) The mental health community services account is an account in the general revenue fund that may be appropriated only for the provision of mental health services by or under contract with the department.

(b) The department shall deposit to the credit of the mental health community services account any money donated to the state for inclusion in the account, including life insurance proceeds designated for deposit to the account.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 198, Sec. 2.80, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533.085. FACILITIES FOR INMATE AND PAROLEE CARE. (a) With the written approval of the governor, the department may contract with the Texas Department of Criminal Justice to transfer facilities to the Texas Department of Criminal Justice or otherwise provide facilities for:

(1) inmates with mental illness in the custody of the Texas Department of Criminal Justice; or

(2) persons with mental illness paroled or released under the supervision of the Texas Department of Criminal Justice.

(b) An agency must report to the governor the agency's reasons for proposing to enter into a contract under this section and request the governor's approval.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 25.107, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533.087. LEASE OF REAL PROPERTY. (a) The department, in coordination with the executive commissioner, may lease real property related to the provision of services under this title, including any improvements under the department's management and control, regardless of whether the property is surplus property. Except as provided by Subsection (c), the department, in coordination with the executive commissioner, may award a lease of real property only:

(1) at the prevailing market rate; and

(2) by competitive bid.

(b) The commission shall advertise a proposal for lease at least once a week for four consecutive weeks in:

(1) a newspaper published in the municipality in which the property is located or the daily newspaper published nearest to the property's location; and

(2) a newspaper of statewide circulation.

(c) The department, in coordination with the executive commissioner, may lease real property related to the provision of services under this title or an improvement for less than the prevailing market rate, without advertisement or without competitive bidding, if:

(1) the executive commissioner determines that sufficient public benefit will be derived from the lease; and

(2) the property is leased to:

(A) a federal or state agency;

(B) a unit of local government;

(C) a not-for-profit organization; or

(D) an entity related to the department by a service contract.

(d) The executive commissioner shall adopt leasing rules, forms, and contracts that will protect the state's interests.

(e) The executive commissioner may reject any bid.

(f) This section does not authorize the executive commissioner or department to close or consolidate a facility used to provide mental health services without legislative approval.

(g) Notwithstanding Subsections (a) and (b), the executive commissioner, in coordination with the department, may enter into a written agreement with the General Land Office to administer lease proposals. If the General Land Office administers a lease proposal under the agreement, notice that the property is offered for lease must be published in accordance with Section 32.107, Natural Resources Code.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 821, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1175, Sec. 3, eff. June 18, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER E. JAIL DIVERSION PROGRAM

Sec. 533.108. PRIORITIZATION OF FUNDING FOR DIVERSION OF PERSONS FROM INCARCERATION IN CERTAIN COUNTIES. (a) A local mental health authority may develop and may prioritize its available funding for:

(1) a system to divert members of the priority population, including those members with co-occurring substance abuse disorders, before their incarceration or other contact with the criminal justice system, to services appropriate to their needs, including:

(A) screening and assessment services; and

(B) treatment services, including:

(i) assertive community treatment services;

(ii) inpatient crisis respite services;

(iii) medication management services;

(iv) short-term residential services;

(v) shelter care services;

(vi) crisis respite residential services;

(vii) outpatient integrated mental health services;

(viii) co-occurring substance abuse treatment services;

(ix) psychiatric rehabilitation and service coordination services;

(x) continuity of care services; and

(xi) services consistent with the Texas Correctional Office on Offenders with Medical or Mental Impairments model;

(2) specialized training of local law enforcement and court personnel to identify and manage offenders or suspects who may be members of the priority population; and

(3) other model programs for offenders and suspects who may be members of the priority population, including crisis intervention training for law enforcement personnel.

(b) A local mental health authority developing a system, training, or a model program under Subsection (a) shall collaborate with other local resources, including local law enforcement and judicial systems and local personnel.

(c) A local mental health authority may not implement a system, training, or a model program developed under this section until the system, training, or program is approved by the department.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1214, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.